New York, session 2025-2026, S7583.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 163 of the state finance law, as 2 amended by chapter 110 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 6. Discretionary buying thresholds. Pursuant to guidelines established 5 by the state procurement council: 6 (a) the commissioner may purchase services and commodities for the 7 office of general services or its customer agencies serviced by the 8 office of general services business services center in an amount not 9 exceeding eighty-five thousand dollars without a formal competitive 10 process; 11 (b) state agencies may purchase services and commodities in an amount 12 not exceeding fifty thousand dollars without a formal competitive proc- 13 ess; 14 (c) state agencies may purchase commodities or services, including 15 construction services, from small business concerns, or commodities or 16 technology that are recycled or remanufactured in an amount not exceed- 17 ing one million five hundred thousand dollars without a formal compet- 18 itive process; 19 (d) state agencies may purchase commodities or services from those 20 certified pursuant to article fifteen-A of the executive law and article 21 three of the veterans' services law in an amount not exceeding seven 22 hundred fifty thousand dollars without a formal competitive process; and 23 (e) state agencies may purchase commodities that are food, including 24 milk and milk products, or animal or plant fiber products, grown, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11072-01-5 S. 7583 2 1 produced, harvested, or processed in New York state or textile products 2 manufactured from animal or plant fiber grown or produced predominantly 3 in New York state in an amount not to exceed two hundred thousand 4 dollars without a formal competitive process. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 6 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to section 163 7 of the state finance law made by section one of this act shall not 8 affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed there- 9 with. Effective immediately the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 10 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 11 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 12 date.